Florida, session 2026, HB1393.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) and paragraph
(a) of subsection (5) of section 1002.33, Florida Statutes, are
amended, and paragraph (e) is added to subsection (15) of that
section, to read:
1002.33 Charter schools.—
(3) APPLICATION FOR CHARTER STATUS.—
(b) An application for a conversion charter school must be
made by the district school board, the principal, teachers,
parents whose children are enrolled at the school, or the school
advisory council at an existing public school that has been in
operation for at least 2 years before the application to
convert. A public school-within-a-school designated as a school
by the district school board may also apply to convert to
charter status. A municipality seeking to attract job-producing
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1393-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1393 2026
entities by establishing a job engine charter school pursuant to
paragraph (15)(c) may apply to a the district school board,
Florida College System institution, or state university to
convert an existing public school to a charter school. An
application submitted proposing to convert an existing public
school to a charter school must demonstrate the support of at
least 50 percent of the parents voting whose children are
enrolled at the school, provided that a majority of the parents
eligible to vote participate in the ballot process, according to
rules adopted by the State Board of Education. A district school
board, Florida College System institution, or state university
that denies an application for a conversion charter school shall
provide notice of denial to the applicants in writing within 10
days after the meeting at which the district school board denied
the application. The notice must articulate in writing the
specific reasons for denial and must provide documentation
supporting those reasons. A private school, parochial school, or
home education program is not eligible for charter school
status.
(5) SPONSOR; DUTIES.—
(a) Sponsoring entities.—
1. A district school board may sponsor a charter school in
the county over which the district school board has
jurisdiction.
2.a. A state university may grant a charter to a lab
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1393-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1393 2026
school created under s. 1002.32 and shall be considered to be
the school's sponsor. Such school shall be considered a charter
lab school.
b. A state university may grant a charter to a
municipality establishing a job engine charter school.
3. Because needs relating to educational capacity,
workforce qualifications, and career education opportunities are
constantly changing and extend beyond school district
boundaries:
a. A state university may, upon approval by the Department
of Education, solicit applications and sponsor a charter school
to meet regional education or workforce demands by serving
students from multiple school districts.
b. A Florida College System institution may, upon approval
by the Department of Education, solicit applications and sponsor
a charter school or a job engine charter school in any county
within its service area to meet workforce demands and may offer
postsecondary programs leading to industry certifications to
eligible charter school students. A charter school established
under subparagraph (b)4. may not be sponsored by a Florida
College System institution until its existing charter with the
school district expires as provided under subsection (7).
c. Notwithstanding paragraph (6)(b), a state university or
Florida College System institution may, at its discretion, deny
an application for a charter school.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1393-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1393 2026
d. The Charter School Review Commission, as authorized
under s. 1002.3301, may solicit and review applications for
charter schools overseen by district school boards and, upon the
commission approving an application, the district school board
that oversees the school district in which the charter school
will be located shall serve as sponsor.
(15) CHARTER SCHOOLS-IN-THE-WORKPLACE; CHARTER SCHOOLS-IN-
A-MUNICIPALITY.—
(e) All taxes levied by the school district within the
attendance zone of a conversion job engine charter school
sponsored by a Florida College System institution or state
university shall be provided to the sponsor annually, beginning
with the next fiscal year after such school is established. For
purposes of this paragraph, the term "attendance zone" means the
attendance zone of the public school at the time of the school's
conversion to a job engine charter school.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1393-00